Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,243
Director, defined.

Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 152;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 440.